Washington statutes.
RCW 42.26.090

Regulations for petty cash and accounts.

The director of financial management shall adopt such regulations as may be necessary or desirable to implement the provisions of this chapter. Such regulation shall include but not be limited to, (1) defining limitations on the use of petty cash, and (2) providing accounting and reporting procedures for operation of the petty cash account.

[ 1979 c 151 s 79; 1969 ex.s. c 60 s 9.]